West Virginia, session 2026, SB371.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Secretary of State. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 24, 2025, authorized under the authority of §3-1-48 of this code, relating to the Secretary of State (loan and grant programs under the Help America Vote Act for the purchase of voting equipment, election systems, software, services, and upgrades, 153 CSR 10), is authorized.